Massachusetts, session 194th, H4222.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the Department of Mental 
Health shall establish a sick leave bank for Esther Odufuwa, an employee of the Department of 
Mental Health. Any employee of the Department of Mental Health may voluntarily contribute 1 
or more sick, personal or vacation days to the sick leave bank for use by Esther Odufuwa. If 
Esther Odufuwa terminates employment with the Department of Mental Health or requests to 
dissolve the sick leave bank, any remaining time in the sick leave bank shall be transferred to the 
extended illness leave bank. Sick leave bank days shall not be used for absences unrelated to the 
illness or disability that necessitated the establishment of the sick leave bank as determined by 
the Department of Mental Health.